Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-235
County fair; dissolution; duty of county board.

(1) Upon being satisfied that sections 2-232 to 2-234 have been substantially complied with and that sixty percent of all the votes cast on the proposition are in favor of the dissolution, the county board shall cause such proposition and all the proceedings had thereon to be entered upon the records of the county board and shall notify the county fair board of the results of the election.

(2) Upon receiving such notice, an elected county fair board shall transfer by deed all real property and by bill of sale all personal property to the county for disposition pursuant to section 2-236.

Laws 1927, c. 51, § 4, p. 206;

C.S.1929, § 2-225;

R.S.1943, § 2-235;

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 13.